test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-М_В-словарь_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - словарь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: слова́рь
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: слова́рь
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: словаря́
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: словаре́
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: словарю́
      словарь+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: словарём
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: словари́
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: словари́
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: словаре́й
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: словаря́х
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: словаря́м
      словарь+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: словаря́ми
